California, session 20252026, AB426.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 53069.65 is added to the Government Code, to read:53069.65.SECTION 1. Section 1708.83 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1708.83. (a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), a local agency, as defined in Section 54951, may impose a civil penalty not exceeding seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) upon a A person who operates or uses shall not operate or use an unmanned aerial vehicle, remote piloted aircraft, or drone at the scene of an emergency and thereby impedes impede firefighters, peace officers, medical personnel, military personnel, or other emergency personnel in the performance of their fire suppression, law enforcement, or emergency response duties.(b) The Attorney General or a county counsel or city attorney may bring a civil action to enforce subdivision (a). The prevailing plaintiff in an action may recover any of the following in any court of competent jurisdiction:(1) A civil penalty not exceeding seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) for each violation.(2) Injunctive relief.(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.(b)(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a person who has been granted a Part 107 Operational Waiver issued by the Federal Aviation Administration pursuant to Section 107.200 of the Code of Federal Regulations.